Nevada, session 83, AB79.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 294A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 5, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2.5. 1. A person shall not make or commit to make a
contribution or contributions to a candidate for any office, except
a federal office, in a special election in an amount which exceeds
$5,000, regardless of:
(a) The number of candidates for the office; or
(b) Whether the special election is held on the same day as a
primary election or general election.
2. No contribution to a candidate in a recall election may be
given or received except during the period:
(a) Beginning on the date that the declaration of a special
election is made; and
(b) Ending on the date of the special election.
3. No contribution made, committed to be made or accepted
pursuant to this section for a special election affects the
limitations on the amount of contributions that may be committed,
contributed or accepted pursuant to NRS 294A.100 for a primary
election or general election.
4. A candidate shall not accept a contribution or commitment
to make a contribution made in violation of this section.
5. A person who willfully violates any provision of this
section is guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as
provided in NRS 193.130.
6. The provisions of this section apply to any special election
other than a special election to recall a public officer.
Secs. 3 and 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4.5. 1. For the purposes of an investigation or
proceeding under this chapter, the Secretary of State or any
officer or employee designated by the Secretary of State by
regulation, order or written direction may conduct hearings,
administer oaths and affirmations, render findings of fact and
conclusions of law, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance,
take evidence and require the production, by subpoena or
otherwise, of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda,
agreements or other records which the Secretary of State
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
determines to be relevant or material to the investigation or
proceeding.
2. If the Secretary of State or any officer or employee
designated by the Secretary of State plans to require the
production by subpoena of any books, papers, correspondence,
memoranda, agreements or other records pursuant to subsection
1, the Secretary of State or designated officer or employee shall, at
least 7 days before issuing the subpoena, provide to the person
who is the subject of the investigation or proceeding notice by
certified mail of the intent of the Secretary of State or the
designated officer or employee to issue the subpoena to permit
such a person to object to and seek issuance of a protective order
against the subpoena.
3. A person whom the Secretary of State does not consider to
be the subject of an investigation is entitled to reimbursement at
the rate of 25 cents per page for copies of records which the
person is required by subpoena to produce. The Secretary of State
may require or permit a person to file a statement, under oath or
otherwise as the Secretary of State determines, as to the facts and
circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated.
4. If a person does not testify or produce the records required
by the Secretary of State or a designated officer or employee
pursuant to subpoena, the Secretary of State or designated officer
or employee may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for an
order compelling compliance. The court shall give this matter
priority over other civil matters to which priority is not given by
other statutes.
5. Any decision of the Secretary of State or any officer or
employee is a final decision for the purposes of judicial review.
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5.5. NRS 294A.0035 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
294A.0035 “Campaign expenses” means:
1. All expenses incurred by a candidate for a campaign,
including, without limitation:
(a) Office expenses;
(b) Expenses related to volunteers;
(c) Expenses related to travel;
(d) Expenses related to advertising;
(e) Expenses related to paid staff;
(f) Expenses related to consultants;
(g) Expenses related to polling;
(h) Expenses related to special events;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(i) Expenses related to a legal defense fund;
(j) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 294A.362, goods and
services provided in kind for which money would otherwise have
been paid;
(k) Contributions made to another candidate, a nonprofit
corporation that is registered or required to be registered pursuant to
NRS 294A.225, a committee for political action that is registered or
required to be registered pursuant to NRS 294A.230 or a committee
for the recall of a public officer that is registered or required to be
registered pursuant to NRS 294A.250;
[(k)] (l) Fees for filing declarations of candidacy; and
[(l)] (m) Repayment or forgiveness of a loan.
2. Expenditures, as defined in NRS 294A.0075.
3. The disposal of any unspent contributions pursuant to NRS
294A.117 or 294A.160.
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.3. NRS 294A.0055 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
294A.0055 1. “Committee for political action” means:
(a) Any group of natural persons or entities that solicits or
receives contributions from any other person, group or entity and:
(1) Makes or intends to make contributions to candidates or
other persons; or
(2) Makes or intends to make expenditures,
 designed to affect the outcome of any primary election, general
election, special election or question on the ballot.
(b) [Any] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, any
business or social organization, corporation, partnership,
association, trust [,] or unincorporated organization : [or labor
union:]
(1) Which has as its primary purpose affecting the outcome
of any primary election, general election, special election or any
question on the ballot and for that purpose receives contributions in
excess of $1,500 in a calendar year or makes expenditures in excess
of $1,500 in a calendar year; or
(2) Which does not have as its primary purpose affecting the
outcome of any primary election, general election, special election
or any question on the ballot, but for the purpose of affecting the
outcome of any election or question on the ballot receives
contributions in excess of $5,000 in a calendar year or makes
independent expenditures in excess of $5,000 in a calendar year.
2. “Committee for political action” does not include:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(a) An organization made up of legislative members of a
political party whose primary purpose is to provide support for their
political efforts.
(b) An entity solely because it provides goods or services to a
candidate or committee in the regular course of its business at the
same price that would be provided to the general public.
(c) An individual natural person.
(d) [Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of subsection
1, an] An individual corporation or other business organization who
has filed articles of incorporation or other documentation of
organization with the Secretary of State pursuant to title 7 of NRS.
(e) [Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of subsection
1, a] A labor union.
(f) A personal campaign committee or the personal
representative of a candidate who receives contributions or makes
expenditures that are reported as contributions or expenditures by
the candidate.
(g) A committee for the recall of a public officer.
(h) A major or minor political party or any committee sponsored
by a major or minor political party.
Sec. 6.5. NRS 294A.100 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
294A.100 1. A person shall not make or commit to make a
contribution or contributions to a candidate for any office, except a
federal office, in an amount which exceeds $5,000 for the primary
election, regardless of the number of candidates for the office [,] at
the primary election, and $5,000 for the general election, regardless
of the number of candidates for the office [,] at the general election,
during the period:
(a) Beginning January 1 of the year immediately following the
last general election for the office and ending December 31
immediately following the next general election for the office, if that
office is a state, district, county or township office; or
(b) Beginning from 30 days after the last election for the office
and ending 30 days after the next general city election for the office,
if that office is a city office.
2. A candidate shall not accept a contribution or commitment
to make a contribution made in violation of subsection 1.
3. No contribution made, committed to be made or accepted
pursuant to this section to a candidate for a primary election or
general election affects the limitations on the amount of
contributions that may be committed, contributed or accepted
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
pursuant to NRS 294A.115 for a special election to recall a public
officer [.] or section 2.5 of this act for any other special election.
4. A person who willfully violates any provision of this section
is guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
Sec. 7. NRS 294A.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.130 1. Every candidate shall, not later than 1 week
after receiving minimum contributions of $100, [open] do the
following:
(a) Open and maintain a separate account in a financial
institution located in the United States for the deposit of any
contributions received. The candidate shall not commingle the
money in the account with money collected for other purposes.
(b) Unless the candidate is a public officer running for
reelection, file with the Secretary of State a notice of intent to file
for candidacy. A public officer running for reelection may, but is
not required to, file a notice of intent to file for candidacy
pursuant to this section.
2. The candidate may close the separate account if the
candidate:
(a) Was a candidate in a special election, after that election;
(b) Lost in the primary election, after the primary election; or
(c) Won the primary election, after the general election,
 and as soon as all payments of money committed have been
made.
3. Every committee for political action, committee sponsored
by a political party and committee for the recall of a public officer
shall, not later than 1 week after receiving contributions the sum of
which, in the aggregate, is $1,000 or more, open and maintain a
separate account in a financial institution located in the United
States for the deposit of any contributions received. The committee
for political action, committee sponsored by a political party or
committee for the recall of a public officer shall not commingle the
money in the account with money collected for other purposes.
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8.5. NRS 294A.160 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
294A.160 1. It is unlawful for:
(a) A candidate to spend money received as a contribution:
(1) For the candidate’s personal use; or
(2) To pay himself or herself a salary.
(b) A public officer to spend unspent contributions:
(1) For the public officer’s personal use; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(2) To pay himself or herself a salary.
 The provisions of this subsection do not prohibit a candidate or
public officer from using contributions or unspent contributions,
as applicable, to pay for any ordinary and necessary expense that
is incurred in connection with the duties of a campaign or public
office, as applicable.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 294A.286, a
candidate or public officer may use contributions to pay for any
legal expenses that the candidate or public officer incurs in relation
to a campaign or serving in public office without establishing a legal
defense fund. Any such candidate or public officer shall report any
expenditure of contributions to pay for legal expenses in the same
manner and at the same time as the report filed pursuant to NRS
294A.120 or 294A.200. A candidate or public officer shall not use
contributions to satisfy a civil or criminal penalty imposed by law.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, every
candidate for office at a primary election, general election or special
election who is elected to that office and received contributions that
were not spent or committed for expenditure before the primary
election, general election or special election shall dispose of the
money through one or any combination of the following methods:
(a) Return the unspent money to contributors;
(b) Use the money in the candidate’s next election or for the
payment of other expenses related to public office or his or her
campaign, regardless of whether he or she is a candidate for a
different office in the candidate’s next election;
(c) Contribute the money to:
(1) The campaigns of other candidates for public office or for
the payment of debts related to their campaigns;
(2) If the candidate was elected to the office of a Legislator,
another member of the Legislature who is authorized to solicit or
accept contributions pursuant to NRS 294A.117;
(3) A political party; or
(4) Any combination of persons or groups set forth in
subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3);
(d) Donate the money to any tax-exempt nonprofit entity; or
(e) Donate the money to any governmental entity or fund of this
State or a political subdivision of this State. A candidate who
donates money pursuant to this paragraph may request that the
money be used for a specific purpose.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, every
candidate for office at a primary election, general election or special
election who withdraws pursuant to NRS 293.202 or 293C.195 after
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
filing a declaration of candidacy, is removed from the ballot by
court order or is defeated for or otherwise not elected to that office
and who received contributions that were not spent or committed for
expenditure before the primary election, general election or special
election shall, not later than the 15th day of the second month after
the election, dispose of the money through one or any combination
of the following methods:
(a) Return the unspent money to contributors;
(b) Contribute the money to:
(1) The campaigns of other candidates for public office or for
the payment of debts related to their campaigns;
(2) A political party; or
(3) Any combination of persons or groups set forth in
subparagraphs (1) and (2);
(c) Donate the money to any tax-exempt nonprofit entity; or
(d) Donate the money to any governmental entity or fund of this
State or a political subdivision of this State. A candidate who
donates money pursuant to this paragraph may request that the
money be used for a specific purpose.
5. Every candidate for office at a special election to recall a
public officer shall dispose of the unspent contributions through one
or any combination of the methods set forth in subsection 4 not later
than the 15th day of the second month following the last day for the
candidate to receive a contribution pursuant to NRS 294A.115.
6. Every candidate for office who withdraws after filing a
declaration of candidacy, is defeated for that office at a primary
election or is removed from the ballot by court order before a
primary election or general election and who received a contribution
from a person in excess of $5,000 shall, not later than the 15th day
of the second month after the primary election or general election,
as applicable, return any money in excess of $5,000 to the
contributor.
7. Except for a former public officer who is subject to the
provisions of subsection 11, every person who qualifies as a
candidate by receiving one or more qualifying contributions in
excess of $100 but who, within 4 years after the date of receiving
the first of those qualifying contributions, does not:
(a) File a declaration of candidacy; or
(b) Appear on an official ballot at any election,
 shall, not later than the 15th day of the month after the end of the
4-year period, dispose of all contributions that have not been spent
or committed for expenditure through one or any combination of the
methods set forth in subsection 4.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
8. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, every public
officer who:
(a) Does not run for reelection to the office which he or she
holds;
(b) Is not a candidate for any other office and does not qualify as
a candidate by receiving one or more qualifying contributions in
excess of $100; and
(c) Has contributions that are not spent or committed for
expenditure remaining from a previous election,
 shall, not later than the 15th day of the second month after the
expiration of the public officer’s term of office, dispose of those
contributions in the manner provided in subsection 4.
9. Every public officer who:
(a) Resigns from his or her office;
(b) Is not a candidate for any other office and does not qualify as
a candidate by receiving one or more qualifying contributions in
excess of $100; and
(c) Has contributions that are not spent or committed for
expenditure remaining from a previous election,
 shall, not later than the 15th day of the second month after the
effective date of the resignation, dispose of those contributions in
the manner provided in subsection 4.
10. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 11, every
public officer who:
(a) Does not run for reelection to the office which he or she
holds or who resigns from his or her office;
(b) Is a candidate for any other office or qualifies as a candidate
by receiving one or more qualifying contributions in excess of $100;
and
(c) Has contributions that are not spent or committed for
expenditure remaining from a previous election,
 may use the unspent contributions in a future election. Such a
public officer is subject to the reporting requirements set forth in
NRS 294A.120, 294A.125, 294A.128, 294A.200 and 294A.362 for
as long as the public officer is a candidate for any office or qualifies
as a candidate by receiving one or more qualifying contributions in
excess of $100.
11. Every former public officer described in subsection 10 who
qualifies as a candidate by receiving one or more qualifying
contributions in excess of $100 but who, within 4 years after the
date of receiving the first of those qualifying contributions, does not:
(a) File a declaration of candidacy; or
(b) Appear on an official ballot at any election,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
 shall, not later than the 15th day of the month after the end of the
4-year period, dispose of all contributions that have not been spent
or committed for expenditure through one or any combination of the
methods set forth in subsection 4.
12. In addition to the methods for disposing of the unspent
money set forth in this section, a Legislator may donate not more
than $500 of that money to the Nevada Silver Haired Legislative
Forum created pursuant to NRS 427A.320.
13. Any contributions received before a candidate for office at
a primary election, general election or special election dies that were
not spent or committed for expenditure before the death of the
candidate must be disposed of in the manner provided in
subsection 4.
14. The court shall, in addition to any [penalty] administrative
fine which may be imposed pursuant to NRS 294A.420, order the
candidate or public officer to dispose of any remaining contributions
in the manner provided in this section.
15. As used in this section:
(a) “Contribution” includes, without limitation, any interest and
other income earned on a contribution.
(b) “Qualifying contribution” means the receipt of a contribution
that causes a person to qualify as a candidate pursuant to subsection
3 of NRS 294A.005.
Secs. 9 and 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10.3. NRS 294A.210 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
294A.210 1. The provisions of this section apply to:
(a) Every person who makes an independent expenditure in
excess of $1,000; [and]
(b) Every committee for political action, political party and
committee sponsored by a political party which receives
contributions in excess of $1,000 or makes an expenditure for or
against a candidate for office or a group of such candidates [.] ; and
(c) Every person that makes expenditures in excess of $1,000
designed to affect the outcome of any primary election, general
election or special election or question of the ballot and that is:
(1) An individual corporation or other business
organization that has filed articles of incorporation or other
documentation of organization with the Secretary of State
pursuant to title 7 of NRS;
(2) A nonprofit organization or nonprofit corporation duly
organized under federal law or under the laws of this State, any
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
other state, the District of Columbia or any territory of the United
States; or
(3) A labor union.
2. Every person, committee and political party described in
subsection 1 shall, not later than January 15 of the election year, for
the period beginning January 1 of the previous year and ending on
December 31 of the previous year, report each independent
expenditure or other expenditure, as applicable, made during the
period in excess of $1,000 and independent expenditures or other
expenditures, as applicable, made during the period to one recipient
which cumulatively exceed $1,000.
3. In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection 2,
every person, committee and political party described in subsection
1 shall, not later than:
(a) April 15 of the election year, for the period beginning
January 1 and ending on March 31 of the election year;
(b) July 15 of the election year, for the period beginning April 1
and ending on June 30 of the election year;
(c) October 15 of the election year, for the period beginning
July 1 and ending on September 30 of the election year; and
(d) January 15 of the year immediately following the election
year, for the period beginning October 1 and ending on
December 31 of the election year,
 report each independent expenditure or other expenditure, as
applicable, in excess of $1,000 made during the period and
independent expenditures or other expenditures, as applicable, made
during the period to one recipient which cumulatively exceed
$1,000.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5, 6 and 7 and
NRS 294A.223, every person, committee and political party
described in subsection 1 which makes an independent expenditure
or other expenditure, as applicable, for or against a candidate for
office at a special election or for or against a group of such
candidates shall, not later than:
(a) Four days before the beginning of early voting by personal
appearance for the special election, for the period from the
nomination of the candidate through 5 days before the beginning of
early voting by personal appearance for the special election;
(b) Four days before the special election, for the period from 4
days before the beginning of early voting by personal appearance
for the special election through 5 days before the special election;
and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
(c) Thirty days after the special election, for the remaining
period through the date of the special election,
 report each independent expenditure or other expenditure, as
applicable, in excess of $1,000 made during the period and
independent expenditures or other expenditures, as applicable, made
during the period to one recipient which cumulatively exceed
$1,000.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 6 and 7 and
NRS 294A.223, every person, committee and political party
described in subsection 1 which makes an independent expenditure
or other expenditure, as applicable, for or against a candidate for
office at a special election to determine whether a public officer will
be recalled or for or against a group of such candidates shall, not
later than:
(a) Four days before the beginning of early voting by personal
appearance for the special election, for the period from the date the
notice of intent to circulate the petition for recall is filed pursuant to
NRS 306.015 through 5 days before the beginning of early voting
by personal appearance for the special election;
(b) Four days before the special election, for the period from 4
days before the beginning of early voting by personal appearance
for the special election through 5 days before the special election;
and
(c) Thirty days after the special election, for the remaining
period through the date of the special election,
 report each independent expenditure or other expenditure, as
applicable, in excess of $1,000 made during the period and
independent expenditures or other expenditures, as applicable, made
during the period to one recipient which cumulatively exceed
$1,000.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, if a petition
for recall is not submitted to the filing officer before the expiration
of the notice of intent pursuant to the provisions of chapter 306 of
NRS or is otherwise legally insufficient when submitted to the filing
officer pursuant to the provisions of that chapter, every person,
committee and political party described in subsection 1 which
makes an independent expenditure or other expenditure, as
applicable, for or against a candidate for office at a special election
to determine whether a public officer will be recalled or for or
against a group of such candidates shall, not later than 30 days after
the expiration of the notice of intent, for the period from the filing of
the notice of intent through the date that the notice of intent expires
or the petition is determined to be legally insufficient, report each of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
the campaign expenses described in subsection 1 incurred during the
period. The provisions of this subsection apply to the person,
committee and political party if the petition for recall:
(a) Is not submitted to the filing officer as required by chapter
306 of NRS;
(b) Is submitted to the filing officer without any valid signatures
or with fewer than the necessary number of valid signatures required
by chapter 306 of NRS; or
(c) Is otherwise legally insufficient or efforts to obtain the
necessary number of valid signatures required by chapter 306 of
NRS are suspended or discontinued.
7. If the legal sufficiency of a petition for recall is challenged
and a district court determines that the petition is legally:
(a) Sufficient pursuant to chapter 306 of NRS and the order of
the district court is appealed, every person, committee and political
party described in subsection 1 which makes an independent
expenditure or other expenditure, as applicable, for or against a
candidate for office at a special election to determine whether a
public officer will be recalled or for or against a group of such
candidates shall:
(1) Not later than 30 days after the date on which the notice
of appeal is filed, for the period from the filing of the notice of
intent to circulate the petition for recall through the date on which
the notice of appeal is filed, report each independent expenditure or
other expenditure, as applicable, in excess of $1,000 made during
the period and independent expenditures or expenditures, as
applicable, made during the period to one recipient which
cumulatively exceed $1,000.
(2) Not later than 30 days after the date on which all appeals
regarding the petition are exhausted, for the period from the day
after the date on which the notice of appeal is filed through the date
on which all appeals regarding the petition are exhausted, report
each independent expenditure or other expenditure, as applicable, in
excess of $1,000 made during the period and independent
expenditures or expenditures, as applicable, made during the period
to one recipient which cumulatively exceed $1,000.
(b) Insufficient pursuant to chapter 306 of NRS, every person,
committee and political party described in subsection 1 which
makes an independent expenditure or other expenditure, as
applicable, for or against a candidate for office at a special election
to determine whether a public officer will be recalled or for or
against a group of such candidates shall:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
(1) Not later than 30 days after the date on which the district
court orders the filing officer to cease any further proceedings
regarding the petition, for the period from the filing of the notice of
intent to circulate the petition for recall through the date of the
district court’s order, report each independent expenditure or other
expenditure, as applicable, in excess of $1,000 made during the
period and independent expenditures or expenditures, as applicable,
made during the period to one recipient which cumulatively exceed
$1,000.
(2) Not later than 30 days after the date on which all appeals
regarding the petition are exhausted, for the period from the day
after the date of the district court’s order through the date on which
all appeals regarding the petition are exhausted, report each
independent expenditure or other expenditure, as applicable, in
excess of $1,000 made during the period and independent
expenditures or expenditures, as applicable, made during the period
to one recipient which cumulatively exceed $1,000.
8. In addition to complying with the applicable requirements of
subsections 2 to 7, inclusive, a person, committee or political party
described in subsection 1 must, not later than January 15 of each
year that is not an election year, for the period beginning January 1
of the previous year and ending on December 31 of the previous
year, report each independent expenditure or other expenditure, as
applicable, made during the period in excess of $1,000 and
independent expenditures or other expenditures, as applicable, made
during the period to one recipient which cumulatively exceed
$1,000. Nothing in this subsection:
(a) Requires the person, committee or political party to report
information that has previously been reported in a timely manner
pursuant to subsections 2 to 7, inclusive; or
(b) Authorizes the person, committee or political party to not
comply with any applicable requirement set forth in subsections 2 to
7, inclusive.
9. Independent expenditures and other expenditures made
within the State or made elsewhere but for use within the State,
including independent expenditures and other expenditures made
outside the State for printing, television and radio broadcasting or
other production of the media, must be included in the report.
10. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 294A.3737, the
reports must be filed electronically with the Secretary of State.
11. If an independent expenditure or other expenditure, as
applicable, is made for or against a group of candidates, the reports
must be itemized by the candidate.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
12. A report shall be deemed to be filed on the date that it was
received by the Secretary of State. Every person, committee or
political party described in subsection 1 shall file a report required
by this section even if the person, committee or political party
receives no contributions.
Sec. 10.5. NRS 294A.230 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
294A.230 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
each committee for political action shall, before it engages in any
activity in this State, register with the Secretary of State on forms
supplied by the Secretary of State.
2. A person who qualifies as a committee for political action in
accordance with:
(a) Subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS
294A.0055 by receiving contributions in excess of $1,500 in a
calendar year or making expenditures in excess of $1,500 in a
calendar year; or
(b) Subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS
294A.0055 by receiving contributions in excess of $5,000 in a
calendar year or making independent expenditures in excess of
$5,000 in a calendar year,
 shall, not later than 7 calendar days after the qualifying event,
register with the Secretary of State on forms supplied by the
Secretary of State. When reporting contributions as required by this
chapter, a person who qualifies as a committee for political action in
accordance with subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1
of NRS 294A.0055 is required to report only those contributions
received for the purpose of affecting the outcome of any primary
election, general election, special election or any question on the
ballot.
3. The form must require:
(a) The name of the committee for political action;
(b) The purpose for which it was organized;
(c) The names, addresses and telephone numbers of its officers;
(d) If the committee for political action is affiliated with any
other organizations, the name, address and telephone number of
each organization;
(e) The name, address and telephone number of its registered
agent; and
(f) Any other information deemed necessary by the Secretary of
State.
4. A committee for political action shall file with the Secretary
of State:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
(a) An amended form for registration within 30 days after any
change in the information contained in the form for registration.
(b) A form for registration on or before January 15 of each year,
regardless of whether there is a change in the information contained
in the most recent form for registration filed by the committee for
political action with the Secretary of State.
5. The Secretary of State shall include on the Secretary of
State’s Internet website the information required pursuant to
subsection 3.
6. For purposes of the [civil penalty] administrative fine that
the Secretary of State may impose pursuant to NRS 294A.420 for
violating the provisions of subsection 1 or 2, if a committee for
political action fails to register with the Secretary of State pursuant
to subsection 1 or 2, each time the committee for political action
engages in any activity in this State constitutes a separate violation
of subsection 1 or 2 for which the Secretary of State may impose [a
civil penalty] an administrative fine.
Sec. 11. NRS 294A.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.410 1. If it appears that the provisions of this chapter
have been violated, the Office of the Secretary of State may [:
(a) Conduct] conduct an investigation concerning the alleged
violation . [and cause the appropriate proceedings to be instituted
and prosecuted in the First Judicial District Court; or
(b) Refer the alleged violation to the Attorney General. The
Attorney General shall investigate the alleged violation and institute
and prosecute the appropriate proceedings in the First Judicial
District Court without delay.]
2. A person who believes that any provision of this chapter has
been violated may notify the Office of the Secretary of State, in
writing, of the alleged violation. The notice must be signed by the
person alleging the violation and include:
(a) The full name and address of the person alleging the
violation;
(b) A clear and concise statement of facts sufficient to establish
that the alleged violation occurred;
(c) Any evidence substantiating the alleged violation;
(d) A certification by the person alleging the violation that the
facts alleged in the notice are true to the best knowledge and belief
of that person; and
(e) Any other information in support of the alleged violation.
3. As soon as practicable after receiving a notice of an alleged
violation pursuant to subsection 2, the Office of the Secretary of
State shall provide a copy of the notice and any accompanying
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
information to the person, if any, alleged in the notice to have
committed the violation. [Any] Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 4, a person who receives a copy of a notice pursuant to
this subsection must, not later than 15 calendar days after
receiving the copy, submit to the Office of the Secretary of State a
response [submitted] to the notice [must be] accompanied by a short
statement of the grounds, if any, for objecting to the alleged
violation and include any evidence substantiating the objection.
4. For good cause shown, the Office of the Secretary of State
may grant a reasonable extension of time for a person who
receives a copy of a notice pursuant to subsection 3 to submit a
response.
5. If the Office of the Secretary of State determines, based on a
notice of an alleged violation received pursuant to subsection 2, that
reasonable suspicion exists that a violation of this chapter has
occurred, the Office of the Secretary of State may conduct an
investigation of the alleged violation. The Office of the Secretary of
State may bring the matter before a hearing officer:
(a) If a timely response is submitted pursuant to subsection 3
or 4, if the Office of the Secretary of State deems it appropriate; or
(b) If a timely response is not submitted pursuant to subsection
3 or 4, upon the expiration of the period provided pursuant to
subsection 3 or 4 to submit a response.
[5. If a notice of an alleged violation is received pursuant to
subsection 2 not later than 180 days after the general election or
special election for the office or ballot question to which the notice
pertains, the Secretary of State, when conducting an investigation of
the alleged violation pursuant to subsection 4, may subpoena
witnesses and require the production by subpoena of any books,
papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements or other
documents or records that the Secretary of State or a designated
officer or employee of the Secretary of State determines are relevant
or material to the investigation and are in the possession of:
(a) Any person alleged in the notice to have committed the
violation; or
(b) If the notice does not include the name of a person alleged to
have committed the violation, any person who the Secretary of State
or a designated officer or employee of the Secretary of State has
reasonable cause to believe produced or disseminated the materials
that are the subject of the notice.
6. If a person fails to testify or produce any documents or
records in accordance with a subpoena issued pursuant to subsection
5, the Secretary of State or designated officer or employee may
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
apply to the court for an order compelling compliance. A request for
an order of compliance may be addressed to:
(a) The district court in and for the county where service may be
obtained on the person refusing to testify or produce the documents
or records, if the person is subject to service of process in this State;
or
(b) A court of another state having jurisdiction over the person
refusing to testify or produce the documents or records, if the person
is not subject to service of process in this State.]
Sec. 12. NRS 294A.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.420 1. [If the Secretary of State receives information
that a candidate, person, organization, committee, political party or
nonprofit corporation that is subject to the provisions of NRS
294A.120, 294A.128, 294A.140, 294A.150, 294A.200, 294A.210,
294A.220, 294A.230, 294A.250, 294A.270, 294A.280 or 294A.286
has not filed a report or form for registration pursuant to the
applicable provisions of those sections, the Secretary of State may,
after giving notice to that candidate, person, organization,
committee, political party or nonprofit corporation, cause the
appropriate proceedings to be instituted in the First Judicial District
Court.
2.] Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a candidate,
person, organization, committee, political party or nonprofit
corporation [that] violates an applicable provision of this chapter [is
subject to a civil penalty] , the Secretary of State may, after notice
and a hearing, impose an administrative fine of not more than
$10,000 for each violation . [and payment of court costs and
attorney’s fees.] The decision of the Secretary of State is a final
decision for the purposes of judicial review.
2. The [civil penalty] administrative fine must be [recovered in
a civil action brought in the name of the State of Nevada by the
Secretary of State in the First Judicial District Court and] deposited
by the Secretary of State for credit to the State General Fund in the
bank designated by the State Treasurer.
3. If [a civil penalty] an administrative fine is imposed
because a candidate, person, organization, committee, political party
or nonprofit corporation has reported its contributions, campaign
expenses, independent expenditures or other expenditures after the
date the report is due, except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, the amount of the [civil penalty] administrative fine is:
(a) If the report is not more than 7 days late, $25 for each day
the report is late.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
(b) If the report is more than 7 days late but not more than 15
days late, $50 for each day the report is late.
(c) If the report is more than 15 days late, $100 for each day the
report is late.
 [A civil penalty] An administrative fine imposed pursuant to this
subsection against a public officer who by law is not entitled to
receive compensation for his or her office or a candidate for such an
office must not exceed a total of $100 if the public officer or
candidate received no contributions and made no expenditures
during the relevant reporting periods.
4. For good cause shown, the Secretary of State may waive [a
civil penalty] or reduce an administrative fine that would otherwise
be imposed pursuant to this section.
5. When considering whether to waive [,] or reduce, pursuant
to subsection 4, [a civil penalty] an administrative fine that would
otherwise be imposed pursuant to subsection 3, the Secretary of
State may consider, without limitation:
(a) The seriousness of the violation, including, without
limitation, the nature, circumstances and extent of the violation;
(b) Any history of violations committed by the candidate,
person, organization, committee, political party or nonprofit
corporation against whom the [civil penalty] administrative fine
would otherwise be imposed;
(c) Any mitigating factor, including, without limitation, whether
the candidate, person, organization, committee, political party or
nonprofit corporation against whom the [civil penalty]
administrative fine would otherwise be imposed reported the
violation, corrected the violation in a timely manner, attempted to
correct the violation or cooperated with the Secretary of State in
resolving the situation that led to the violation;
(d) Whether the violation was inadvertent;
(e) Any knowledge or experience the candidate, person,
organization, committee, political party or nonprofit corporation has
with the provisions of this chapter; and
(f) Any other factor that the Secretary of State deems to be
relevant.
6. If the Secretary of State waives [a civil penalty] or reduces
an administrative fine pursuant to subsection 4, the Secretary of
State shall:
(a) Create a record which sets forth that the [civil penalty]
administrative fine has been waived or reduced and describes the
circumstances that constitute the good cause shown; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
(b) Ensure that the record created pursuant to paragraph (a) is
available for review by the general public.
7. The Secretary of State may enter into a payment agreement
for any administrative fine imposed pursuant to this section.
8. The Secretary of State shall maintain on the Internet
website of the Office of the Secretary of State a list of persons who
have not paid within 90 days any administrative fine imposed
pursuant to this section.
9. The remedies and penalties provided by this chapter are
cumulative, do not abrogate and are in addition to any other
remedies and penalties that may exist at law or in equity, including,
without limitation, any criminal penalty that may be imposed
pursuant to this chapter or NRS 199.120, 199.145 or 239.330.
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13.5. NRS 281.581 is hereby amended to read as follows:
281.581 1. If the Secretary of State receives information that
a public officer or candidate willfully fails to file a financial
disclosure statement or willfully fails to file a financial disclosure
statement in a timely manner pursuant to NRS 281.559, 281.561 or
281.572, the Secretary of State may, after giving notice to the public
officer or candidate, cause the appropriate proceedings to be
instituted in the First Judicial District Court.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a public officer
or candidate who willfully fails to file a financial disclosure
statement or willfully fails to file a financial disclosure statement in
a timely manner pursuant to NRS 281.559, 281.561 or 281.572 is
subject to a civil penalty and payment of court costs and attorney’s
fees. The civil penalty must be recovered in a civil action brought in
the name of the State of Nevada by the Secretary of State in the First
Judicial District Court and deposited by the Secretary of State for
credit to the State General Fund in the bank designated by the State
Treasurer.
3. The amount of the civil penalty is:
(a) If the statement is filed not more than 10 days after the
applicable deadline set forth in subsection 1 of NRS 281.559,
subsection 1 of NRS 281.561 or NRS 281.572, $25.
(b) If the statement is filed more than 10 days but not more than
20 days after the applicable deadline set forth in subsection 1 of
NRS 281.559, subsection 1 of NRS 281.561 or NRS 281.572, $50.
(c) If the statement is filed more than 20 days but not more than
30 days after the applicable deadline set forth in subsection 1 of
NRS 281.559, subsection 1 of NRS 281.561 or NRS 281.572, $100.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
(d) If the statement is filed more than 30 days but not more than
45 days after the applicable deadline set forth in subsection 1 of
NRS 281.559, subsection 1 of NRS 281.561 or NRS 281.572, $250.
(e) If the statement is not filed or is filed more than 45 days after
the applicable deadline set forth in subsection 1 of NRS 281.559,
subsection 1 of NRS 281.561 or NRS 281.572, $2,000.
4. For good cause shown, the Secretary of State may waive or
reduce a civil penalty that would otherwise be imposed pursuant to
this section. If the Secretary of State waives or reduces a civil
penalty pursuant to this subsection, the Secretary of State shall:
(a) Create a record which sets forth that the civil penalty has
been waived or reduced and describes the circumstances that
constitute the good cause shown; and
(b) Ensure that the record created pursuant to paragraph (a) is
available for review by the general public.
5. The Secretary of State may enter into a payment agreement
for any civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section.
6. The Secretary of State shall maintain on the Internet
website of the Office of the Secretary of State a list of persons who
have not paid within 90 days any civil penalty imposed pursuant to
this section.
7. As used in this section, “willfully” means intentionally and
knowingly.
Sec. 14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 14, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any preparatory administrative tasks that
are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)